California statutes. Insurance Code
(2) Except as otherwise required by this article, an insurer, broker, or other person engaged in the insurance business shall not make, publish, disseminate, circulate, or place before the public, or directly or indirectly cause to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, or placed before the public in a newspaper, magazine, or other publication, or in the form of a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, or poster, over a radio or television station or any electronic means of communication available to the public, or in any other way as an advertisement,
 announcement, or statement containing a representation or statement with regard to the group capital calculation, group capital ratio, liquidity stress test results, supporting disclosures for the liquidity stress test of an insurer or an insurer group, or of any component derived in the calculation.

(3) If a materially false statement regarding an insurer’s or insurer group’s group capital calculation, resulting group capital ratio, liquidity stress test result, or supporting disclosures for the liquidity stress test, or an inappropriate comparison of any amount to an insurer’s or insurance group’s group capital calculation, resulting group capital ratio, liquidity stress test result, or liquidity stress test supporting disclosures, is published in a written publication and the insurer is able to demonstrate to the commissioner with
 substantial proof the falsity or inappropriateness of the statement, then the insurer, notwithstanding paragraph (2), may publish announcements in a written publication if the sole purpose of the announcement is to rebut the materially false statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 117.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.9.

The commissioner may, upon notice and opportunity for all interested persons to be heard, issue such rules, regulations, and orders as shall be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1215.8 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 282, Sec. 9.   (SB 1448)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.10.

(a) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any insurer or any director, officer, employee, or agent thereof has committed or is about to commit a violation of this article or of any rule, regulation, or order issued by the commissioner hereunder, the commissioner may apply to the superior court for the county in which the principal office of the insurer is located, or if such insurer has no such office in this state, then to the Superior Court for the County of Los Angeles, or for the City and County of San Francisco, for an order enjoining such insurer or such director, officer, employee, or agent thereof from violating or continuing to violate this article or any such rule, regulation, or order,
 and for such other equitable relief as the nature of the case and the interests of the insurer’s policyholders, creditors, and shareholders or the public may require.

(b) No security which is the subject of any agreement or arrangement regarding acquisition, or which is acquired or to be acquired in contravention of the provisions of this article or of any rule, regulation, or order issued by the commissioner hereunder, may be voted at any shareholders’ meeting, or may be counted for quorum purposes, and any action of shareholders requiring the vote of an affirmative percentage of shares may be taken as though such securities were not issued and outstanding. If an insurer or the commissioner has reason to believe that any security of the insurer has been or is about to be acquired in contravention of the provisions of this article or of
 any rule, regulation, or order issued by the commissioner hereunder, the insurer or the commissioner may apply to the Superior Court for the County of Los Angeles or for the City and County of San Francisco or to the superior court for the county in which the insurer has its principal place of business for equitable relief to enjoin the voting of any such security or to void any vote of such security already cast, at any meeting of shareholders.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1215.9 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 282, Sec. 10.   (SB 1448)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.11.

(a) Any insurer that fails to file a statement, report, or request for approval required by this article in a timely manner shall be subject to the late filing fees set forth in Section 924.

(b) Every director or officer of an insurance holding company system who knowingly violates, participates in, or assents to, or who knowingly permits any of the officers or agents of the insurer to engage in transactions or make investments which have not been properly reported or submitted pursuant to Sections 1215.4 and 1215.5, or which violate this article, shall pay, in their individual capacity, a civil forfeiture of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per violation, after notice and
 hearing before the commissioner. In determining the amount of the civil forfeiture, the commissioner shall take into account the appropriateness of the forfeiture with respect to the gravity of the violation, the history of previous violations, and any other matters as justice may require.

(c) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any insurer subject to this article or any director, officer, employee, or agent thereof has engaged in any transaction or entered into a contract which is subject to Section 1215.5 and which would not have been approved had approval been requested, the commissioner may order the insurer to cease and desist immediately any further activity under that transaction or contract. After notice and hearing the commissioner may also order the insurer to void any contracts and restore the status quo if this action is
 in the best interest of the policyholders, creditors, or the public.

(d) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any insurer or any director, officer, employee, or agent thereof has committed a willful violation of this article, the commissioner may cause criminal proceedings to be instituted in the county in which the principal office of the insurer is located, or if such insurer has no such office in the state then by the Attorney General against such insurer or the responsible director, officer, employee, or agent thereof. Any insurer which willfully violates this article shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Any individual who willfully violates this article shall be fined not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000) or, if such willful violation involves the deliberate perpetration of a fraud upon the
 commissioner, imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both.

(e) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has committed a violation of Section 1215.4 that prevents the full understanding of the enterprise risk to the insurer by affiliates or by the insurance holding company system, the violation may serve as an independent basis for disapproving dividends or distributions or for placing the insurer under an order of supervision in accordance with Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1.

(f) Any officer, director, or employee of an insurance holding company system who willfully and knowingly subscribes to or makes or causes to be made any materially false statements, reports, or filings with the intent to
 deceive the commissioner in the performance of his or her duties under this article, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000) or, if the willful violation of this subdivision involves the deliberate perpetration of a fraud upon the commissioner, imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both that imprisonment and fine. Any fines imposed shall be paid by the officer, director, or employee in his or her individual capacity.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1215.10 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 282, Sec. 11.   (SB 1448)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.12.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has committed a violation of this article which so impairs the financial condition of a domestic insurer as to threaten insolvency or make the further transaction of business by it hazardous to its policyholders, creditors, shareholders, or the public, then the commissioner may proceed as provided in Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1 of this part to take possession of the property of the domestic insurer and to conduct the business thereof.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1215.11 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 282, Sec. 12.   (SB 1448)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.13.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has committed a violation of this article which makes the continued operation of an insurer contrary to the interests of policyholders or the public, the commissioner may, after giving notice and an opportunity to be heard, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew that insurer’s license or authority to do business in this state for the period that he or she finds is required for the protection of policyholders or the public.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1215.12 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 282, Sec. 13.   (SB 1448)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.14.

(a) For the purposes of this article only, every foreign insurer, except an insurer described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 12350) of Chapter 1 of Part 6 of Division 2, that is authorized to do business in this state and that, during its three preceding fiscal years taken together, or during any lesser period of time if it has been licensed to transact its business in California only for such lesser period of time, has written an average of more direct premiums in the State of California than it has written in its state of domicile during the same period, and those direct premiums
 written constitute 33 percent or more of its total direct premiums written everywhere in the United States for that three-year or lesser period, as reported in its three most recent annual statements, shall be deemed a “commercially domiciled insurer” within the State of California.

(b) The commissioner may exempt from the provisions of this article any commercially domiciled insurer made subject to this article by subdivision (a) if he or she determines that it has a sufficiently large amount of assets and the evidences of title thereto physically located in California, or that the ratio of those assets to its California policyholder liability is sufficiently large, as to justify the conclusion that there is no reasonable danger that the operations or conduct of the business of the insurer could present a danger of loss
 to California policyholders. The commissioner may also exempt from the provisions of this article any commercially domiciled insurer made subject to this article by subdivision (a) under the circumstances that he or she deems appropriate.

(c) This section does not exempt any foreign insurer that is authorized to do business in this state, including a commercially domiciled insurer, from the provisions of any other sections of this article that may be applicable to the insurer.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1215.13 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 282, Sec. 14.   (SB 1448)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.15.

(a) The provisions of this article shall not apply to any party or entity participating in any investment by a home protection company in its subsidiary or affiliate or any debt or security instruments thereof, an effectuation or attempt to effectuate an acquisition of control or a liquidation of, or merger with, a home protection company, or any material transaction by a home protection company with its affiliate if the investment, effectuation, attempt, or transaction occurred prior to December 31, 1978.

(b) The registration required by Section 1215.4 shall first be applicable to home protection companies who are members of an insurance holding
 company system on January 1, 1980.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1215.13 1/2 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 282, Sec. 15.   (SB 1448)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.16.

All laws and parts of laws of this state inconsistent with this article are hereby superseded with respect to matters covered by this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1215.14 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 282, Sec. 16.   (SB 1448)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.17.

If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this article are severable.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1215.15 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 282, Sec. 17.   (SB 1448)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.18.

(a) If an order for liquidation or rehabilitation of a domestic insurer has been entered, the receiver appointed under that order shall have a right to recover on behalf of the insurer (1) from any parent corporation or holding company or person or affiliate who otherwise controlled the insurer, the amount of distributions other than distributions of shares of the same class of stock paid by the insurer on its capital stock, or (2) any payment in the form of a bonus, termination settlement, or extraordinary lump sum salary adjustment made by the insurer or its subsidiary to a director, officer, or employee, where the distribution or payment pursuant to (1) or (2) is made at any time during the one year
 preceding the petition for liquidation, conservation, or rehabilitation, as the case may be, subject to the limitations of subdivisions (b), (c), and (d).

(b) No distribution shall be recoverable if the parent or affiliate shows that when paid the distribution was lawful and reasonable, and that the insurer did not know and could not reasonably have known that the distribution might adversely affect the ability of the insurer to fulfill its contractual obligations.

(c) Any person who was a parent corporation or holding company or a person who otherwise controlled the insurer or affiliate at the time the distributions were paid shall be liable up to the amount of distributions or payments under subdivision (a) that the person received. Any person who otherwise controlled the insurer
 at the time the distributions were declared shall be liable up to the amount of distributions he or she would have received if they had been paid immediately. If two or more persons are liable with respect to the same distributions, they shall be jointly and severally liable.

(d) The maximum amount recoverable under this section shall be the amount needed in excess of all other available assets of the impaired or insolvent insurer to pay the contractual obligations of the impaired or insolvent insurer and to reimburse any guaranty funds.

(e) To the extent that any person liable under subdivision (c) is insolvent or otherwise fails to pay claims due from it pursuant to that subdivision, its parent corporation or holding company or person who otherwise controlled it at the time
 the distribution was paid, shall be jointly and severally liable for any resulting
 deficiency in the amount recovered from the parent corporation or holding company or person who otherwise controlled it.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1215.16 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 282, Sec. 18.   (SB 1448)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.8. Business Transacted with Producer Controlled Insurer [1216. - 1216.6.]

1216.

This article may be cited as the Business Transacted with Producer Controlled Insurer Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 614, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1216.1.

As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Accredited state” means a state in which the insurance department or regulatory agency having jurisdiction over the business of insurance has qualified as meeting the minimum financial regulatory standards promulgated and established from time to time by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ (NAIC) Financial Regulation Standards and Accreditation Program.

(b) “Control” or “controlled” has the meaning ascribed in Section 1215.

(c) “Controlled insurer” means an admitted insurer which is controlled, directly or indirectly, by a
 producer.

(d) “Controlling producer” means a producer who, directly or indirectly, controls an insurer.

(e) “Admitted insurer” or “insurer” means any person, firm, association, or corporation admitted to transact any property or casualty insurance business in this state. The following are not insurers for the purposes of this article:

(1) All residual market pools and joint underwriting authorities or associations.

(2) All captive insurers, other than risk retention groups as defined in the federal Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 9671), the federal Liability Risk Retention Act of 1986 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 3901 et seq.), and the California Risk Retention Act of 1991 (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 125) of Part 1).
 For the purposes of this article, captive insurers are either insurance companies which are owned by another organization and whose exclusive purpose is to insure risks of the parent organization and affiliated companies, or in the case of groups and associations, insurance organizations which are owned by the insureds and whose exclusive purpose is to insure risks of member organizations and group or association members and their affiliates.

(f) “Producer” means a fire and casualty licensee or licensees or any other person, firm, association, or corporation, when, for any compensation, commission, or other thing of value, the person, firm, association, or corporation acts or aids in any manner in soliciting, negotiating, or procuring the making of any insurance contract on behalf of an insured other than the person, firm, association, or corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 99.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1216.2.

This article shall apply to insurers as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 1216.1, either domiciled in this state or domiciled in a state that is not an accredited state which has in effect a substantially similar law. All provisions of Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 1215) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 1, to the extent that this article does not confer greater authority upon the commissioner or impose more restrictive requirements upon any person, shall continue to apply to all parties within insurance holding company systems which are subject both to Article 4.7 and to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 614, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1216.3.

(a) (1) The provisions of this section shall apply if, in any calendar year, the aggregate amount of gross written premium of business placed with a controlled insurer by a controlling producer is equal to or greater than 5 percent of the admitted assets of the controlled insurer, as reported in the controlled insurers’ quarterly statement filed as of September 30 of the prior year.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the provisions of this section shall not apply if:

(A) The controlling producer both (i) places insurance only with the controlled insurer, or only with the controlled insurer and a member or members of the controlled insurer’s holding company system, or the controlled insurer’s parent, affiliate, or subsidiary and receives no compensation based upon the amount of premiums written in connection with that insurance; and (ii) accepts insurance placements only from nonaffiliated subproducers, and not directly from insureds.

(B) The controlled insurer, except for insurance business written through a residual market facility such as the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan, accepts insurance business only from a controlling producer, a producer controlled by the controlled insurer, or a producer that is a subsidiary of the controlled insurer.

(b) A controlled insurer shall not accept business from a controlling producer and a controlling producer shall not place business with a controlled insurer unless there is a written contract between the controlling producer and the insurer specifying the responsibilities of each party, and the contract has been approved by the board of directors of the insurer and contains the following minimum provisions:

(1) The controlled insurer may terminate the contract for cause upon written notice to the controlling producer. The controlled insurer shall suspend the authority of the controlling producer to write business during the pendency of any dispute regarding the cause for the termination.

(2) The controlling producer shall render accounts to the controlled insurer detailing all material transactions, including information necessary to support all commissions, charges, and other fees received by, or owing to, the controlling producer.

(3) The controlling producer shall remit all funds due under the terms of the contract to the controlled insurer on at least a monthly basis. The due date shall be fixed so that premiums or installments of premiums collected shall be remitted no later than 90 days after the effective date of any policy placed with the controlled insurer under this contract.

(4) All funds collected for the controlled insurer’s account shall be held by the controlling producer in a fiduciary capacity, in one or more appropriately identified bank accounts in banks that are members of the Federal Reserve System, in accordance with the provisions of the insurance law as applicable. However, funds of a controlling producer not required to be licensed in this state shall be maintained in compliance with the requirements of the controlling producer’s domiciliary jurisdiction.

(5) The controlling producer shall maintain separately identifiable records of business written for the controlled insurer.

(6) The contract shall not be assigned in whole or in part by the controlling producer.

(7) The controlled insurer shall provide the controlling producer with its underwriting standards, rules and procedures, manuals setting forth the rates to be charged, and the conditions for the acceptance or rejection of risks. The controlling producer shall adhere to the standards, rules, procedures, rates, and conditions. The standards, rules, procedures, rates, and conditions shall be the same as those applicable to comparable business placed with the controlled insurer by a producer other than the controlling producer.

(8) The rates and terms of the controlling producer’s commissions, charges or other fees, and the purposes for those charges or fees. The rates of the commissions, charges, and other fees shall be no greater than those applicable to comparable business placed with the controlled insurer by producers other than controlling producers. For purposes of this paragraph and paragraph (7), examples of “comparable business” includes the same lines of insurance, same kinds of insurance, same kinds of risks, similar policy limits, and similar quality of business.

(9) If the contract provides that the controlling producer, on insurance business placed with the insurer, is to be compensated contingent upon the insurer’s profits on that business, then this compensation shall not be determined and paid until at least five years after the premiums on liability insurance are earned and at least one year after the premiums are earned on any other insurance. In no event shall the commissions be paid until the adequacy of the controlled insurer’s reserves on remaining claims has been independently verified pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(10) A limit on the controlling producer’s writings in relation to the controlled insurer’s surplus and total writings. The insurer may establish a different limit for each line or subline of business. The controlled insurer shall notify the controlling producer when the applicable limit is approached and shall not accept business from the controlling producer if the limit is reached. The controlling producer shall not place business with the controlled insurer if it has been notified by the controlled insurer that the limit has been reached.

(11) The controlling producer may negotiate but shall not bind reinsurance on behalf of the controlled insurer on business the controlling producer places with the controlled insurer, except that the controlling producer may bind facultative reinsurance contracts pursuant to obligatory facultative agreements if the contract with the controlled insurer contains underwriting guidelines including, for both reinsurance assumed and ceded, a list of reinsurers with which those automatic agreements are in effect, the coverages and amounts or percentages that may be reinsured and commission schedules.

(c) Every controlled insurer shall have an audit committee of the board of directors composed of independent directors. The audit committee shall annually meet with management, the insurer’s independent certified public accountants, and an independent casualty actuary, or other independent loss reserve specialist acceptable to the commissioner, to review the adequacy of the insurer’s loss reserves.

(d) (1) In addition to any other required loss reserve certification, the controlled insurer shall annually, on April 1 of each year, file with the commissioner an opinion of an independent casualty actuary, or other independent loss reserve specialist, acceptable to the commissioner, reporting loss ratios for each line of business written and attesting to the adequacy of loss reserves established for losses incurred and outstanding as of yearend, including incurred but not reported losses, on business placed by the producer.

(2) The controlled insurer shall annually report to the commissioner the amount of commissions paid to the producer, the percentage the amount represents of the net premiums written and comparable amounts and percentages paid to noncontrolling producers for placements of the same kinds of insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 614, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1216.4.

The controlling producer shall, prior to the effective date of the policy, deliver written notice to the prospective insured disclosing the relationship between the producer and the controlled insurer; except that, if the business is placed through a subproducer who is not a controlling producer, the controlling producer shall retain in its records a signed commitment from the subproducer that the subproducer is aware of the relationship between the insurer and the producer and that the subproducer has or will notify the insured of the relationship between the controlling producer and the controlled insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 614, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1216.5.

(a) (1) If the commissioner believes that the controlling producer or any other person has not materially complied with this article, or any regulation or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this article, and after notice and an opportunity to be heard, the commissioner may order the controlling producer to cease placing business with the controlled insurer.

(2) If the commissioner finds that because of any material noncompliance that the controlled insurer or any policyholder thereof has suffered any loss or damage, the commissioner may bring a civil action or intervene in an action brought by or on behalf of the insurer or policyholder for recovery of compensatory damages for the benefit of the insurer or policyholder or other appropriate relief.

(3) Nothing in paragraph (1) shall be construed to limit any authority granted to the commissioner by any other provision of law to issue orders or take actions prior to the holding of a hearing.

(b) If an order for liquidation or rehabilitation of the controlled insurer has been entered pursuant to Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1, and the receiver appointed under that order believes that the controlling producer or any other person has not materially complied with this article, or any regulation or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this article, and the insurer suffered any loss or damage therefrom, the receiver may maintain a civil action for recovery of damages or other appropriate sanctions for the benefit of the insurer.

(c) Nothing contained in this section shall affect the right of the commissioner to impose any other penalties authorized by any other provision of law.

(d) Nothing contained in this section is intended to or shall in any manner limit or diminish the rights of policyholders, claimants, creditors, or other third parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 614, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1216.6.

Controlled insurers and controlling producers who are not in compliance with Section 1216.3 of this act on its effective date shall have 60 days to do so and shall comply with Section 1216.4 beginning with all policies written or renewed on or after March 1, 1993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 614, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Life Insurance Policies [1220. - 1221.]

1220.

Domestic incorporated life insurers may also invest any funds in loans upon any of their own policies in an amount not exceeding the reserve against such policy at the time the loan is made, but policy loans shall not be deposited with the commissioner under Article 2, Chapter 5, Part 2, Division 2.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1221.

The amount thus loaned by an insurer upon its own policies shall be credited to the insurer in determining the amount of deposit required to comply with the provisions of Article 2, Chapter 5, Part 2, Division 2. Such loans shall be deducted from the net value of the registered policies.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Life Insurance Policy Loans [1230. - 1239.5.]

1230.

The Legislature declares that the purpose of this article is to establish guidelines for life insurers to use in life insurance policies which contain a provision for periodic adjustment of policy loan interest rates and are issued after the effective date of this article.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the life insurance industry make available to the people of the State of California who purchase new life insurance policies after the effective date of this act the benefits of higher dividends or lower premiums, or both, resulting from the increased earnings through the use of higher policy loan interest rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1351, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1231.

For the purposes of this article the “published monthly average” means:

(a) Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average-Monthly Average Corporates as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. or any successor thereto.

(b) In the event that Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average-Monthly Average Corporates is no longer published, a substantially similar average, established by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1351, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1232.

(a) Policies issued on or after the effective date of this article shall provide for policy loan interest rates at either of the following rates:

(1) A provision permitting a maximum interest rate of not more than 8 percent per annum.

(2) A provision permitting an adjustable maximum interest rate established from time to time by the life insurer as permitted by law.

(b) The rate of interest charged on a policy loan made under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall not exceed the higher of the following:

(1) The published monthly average for the calendar month ending two months before the date on which the rate is determined.

(2) The rate used to compute the cash surrender values under the policy during the applicable period plus 1 percent per annum.

(c) Any insurer offering insurance policies with an adjustable policy loan interest rate shall establish a written pricing or dividend policy in order that the holders of the policies shall receive a benefit from any earnings of the insurer resulting from the use of the adjustable rate, either by means of higher dividends or lower premiums or a combination of both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1351, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1233.

If the maximum rate of interest is determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1232, the policy shall contain a provision setting forth the frequency at which the rate is to be determined for that policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1351, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1234.

The maximum rate for each policy shall be determined at regular intervals at least once every 12 months, but not more frequently than once in any three-month period.

At the intervals specified in the policy:

(1) The rate being charged may be increased whenever the increase as determined under subdivision (b) of Section 1232 would increase that rate by one-half of 1 percent or more per annum.

(2) The rate being charged shall be reduced whenever the reduction as determined under subdivision (b) of Section 1232 would decrease that rate by one-half of 1 percent or more per annum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1351, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.

The life insurer shall do all of the following:

(1) Notify the policyholder at the time a cash loan is made of the initial rate of interest on the loan.

(2) Notify the policyholder with respect to premium loans of the initial rate of interest on the loan as soon as it is reasonably practical to do so after making the initial loan. Notice need not be given to the policyholder when a further premium loan is added, except as provided in paragraph (3).

(3) Send to policyholders with loans reasonable advance notice of any increase in the rate.

(4) Include in the required notices the substance of the pertinent provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 1232 and Section 1233.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1351, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1236.

The loan value of the policy shall be equivalent to the cash surrender value of the policy, the minimum requirements of which are specified in Sections 10160 through 10165 for life insurance and in Section 11043, for fraternal benefit society policies or certificates, but no policy shall terminate in a policy year as the sole result of change in the interest rate during that policy year. The life insurer shall maintain coverage during that policy year until the time at which it would otherwise have terminated if there had been no change during that policy year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1351, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1237.

The substance of the pertinent provisions of Section 1232 and 1233 shall be set forth in the policies to which the provisions apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1351, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1238.

For the purposes of this section:

(1) The rate of interest on policy loans permitted under this section includes the interest rate charged on reinstatement of policy loans for the period during and after any lapse of a policy.

(2) “Policy loan” includes any premium loan made under a policy to pay one or more premiums that were not paid to the life insurer as they fell due.

(3) “Policyholder” includes the owner of the policy or the person designated to pay premiums as shown on the records of the life insurer.

(4) “Policy” includes certificates issued by a fraternal benefit society and annuity contracts which provide for policy loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1351, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1239.

No other provision of law shall apply to policy loan interest rates unless made specifically applicable to these rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1351, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1239.5.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to any insurance contract issued before the effective date of this article unless the policyholder agrees in writing to the applicability of these provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1351, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Foreign Investments [1240. - 1242.]

1240.

The following definitions shall apply in this article:

(a) “Foreign currency” means a currency other than that of the United States.

(b) “Foreign investment” means an investment in a foreign jurisdiction, or an investment in a person, real estate, or asset domiciled in a foreign jurisdiction, that is substantially of the same kind, class, and investment grade as those eligible for investment under this code, other than under Section 1210 or 1241. An investment shall not be a foreign investment if the issuing person, qualified primary credit source, or qualified guarantor is a domestic jurisdiction or a person domiciled in a domestic jurisdiction, unless both of the following apply:

(1) The issuing person is a shell business entity.

(2) The investment is not assumed, accepted, guaranteed, or insured or otherwise backed by a domestic jurisdiction or a person, that is not a shell business entity, domiciled in a domestic jurisdiction.

 (c) For purposes of subdivision (b), the following definitions apply:

(1) “Shell business entity” means a business entity having no economic substance, except as a vehicle for owning interests in assets issued, owned, or previously owned by a person domiciled in a foreign jurisdiction.

(2) “Qualified guarantor” means a guarantor against which an insurer has a direct claim for full and timely payment, evidenced by a contractual right for which an enforcement action can be brought in a domestic jurisdiction.

(3) “Qualified primary credit source” means the credit source to which an insurer looks for payment as to an investment and against which an insurer has a direct claim for full and timely payment, evidenced by a contractual right for which an enforcement action can be brought in a domestic jurisdiction.

(d) “Foreign jurisdiction” means a jurisdiction other than the United States or any of its political subdivisions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 129, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1241.
